en: Ouzo of Mitilene
el: Ούζο Μυτιλήνης

en: Ouzo of Plomari
el: Ούζο Πλωμαρίου

en: Ouzo of Kalamata
el: Ούζο Καλαμάτας, Ouzo of Kalamata

en: Ouzo of Thrace
el: Ούζο Θράκης, Ouzo of Thrace

en: Ouzo of Macedonia
el: Ούζο Μακεδονίας, Ouzo of Macedonia

en: Tequilas
bg: Текила
de: Tequilas
es: Tequilas
fi: Tequilat
fr: Tequilas
hr: Tekile
hu: Tequilák, Tequila, Tekilák
it: Tequila
ja: テキーラ
lt: Tekila
nl: Tequilas, Tequila
pl: Tequila
ro: Tequilla

en: Patxaran
es: Pacharán
fr: Patxaran, pacharan

en: Eaux de vie, Eau de vie, Clear fruit brandies
de: Eau de vie, Branntwein
fr: Eaux-de-vie, Eau-de-vie
hr: Eaux de vie
it: distillati aromatizzati alla frutta
nl: Vruchtendistillaten

en: Brandys, Brandies
de: Brandys, Brandies
es: Brandys, Brandies, Brandis
fr: Brandys
hr: Rakije
hu: Brandy, Borpárlat
it: Brandy
ja: ブランデー, ブランディ
nl: Brandies, Brandy
pl: Brandy

de: Obstbrand
en: Fruit brandy
fi: Hedelmäviina
hr: Voćna rakija
hu: Gyümölcspárlat
no: Obstler
sv: Obstler

en: Austrian fruit spirit
de: Österreichischer Obstbrand
fr: Eau-de-vie de fruits autrichienne
hr: Austrijska voćna rakija
hu: Osztrák gyümölcspárlatok
it: Distillato di frutta austriaco
nl: Oostenrijkse fruitbrandewijn

en: Bulgarian fruit spirit
hu: Bolgár gyümölcspárlatok

en: Slivova rakya from Troyan
bg: Троянска сливова ракия, Сливова ракия от Троян, Troyanska slivova rakya

en: Slivova rakya from Lovech
bg: Ловешка сливова ракия, Сливова ракия от Ловеч, Loveshka slivova rakya

en: Croatian fruit spirit
hu: Horvát gyümölcspárlatok

en: Slovakian fruit spirit
hu: Szlovák gyümölcspárlatok

en: Borovicka
hu: Borovicska
sk: Borovička

en: Medovaca
ru: Медовача

en: French fruit spirit
hu: Francia gyümölcspárlatok

en: German fruit spirit
hu: Német gyümölcspárlatok